Utah statutes.
10-8-49.   Vagrants -- Arrest -- Fine -- Putting to work -- Municipal lodging.

They may arrest and fine or set to work on the streets or elsewhere all vagrants, mendicants and persons found in the city without visible means of support or some legitimate business, and may establish and maintain municipal lodging and eating houses.

